Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 37. Mississippi Presidential Preference Primary and Delegate Selection.

§ 23-15-1081.
Presidential preference primaries; electors to vote in primary of only one party.

A presidential preference primary may be held on the second Tuesday in March of each year in which a President of the United States is to be elected. Each political party which has cast for its candidates for President and Vice President in the previous presidential election more than twenty percent (20%) of the total vote cast for President and Vice President in the state, may conduct a presidential preference primary. No elector shall vote in the primary of more than one (1) political party in the same presidential preference primary.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-13-3 [Laws, 1986, ch. 484, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 348]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 320, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-1083.
Presidential preference primaries and first congressional primaries to be held on same day; second congressional primaries to be held three weeks thereafter.

Beginning in 1988, as an alternative to the congressional primary election date set forth in Section 23-15-1031, when a political party elects to conduct a presidential preference primary, the first primary election for congressmen, and senators, if senators are to be elected, shall be held on the second Tuesday in March, and the second primary, when one is necessary, shall be held three (3) weeks thereafter, and the election shall be held in all districts of the state on the same day.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-13-5 [Laws, 1986, ch. 484, § 3; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 348]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 321, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-1085.
Notice of party’s intention to hold presidential preference primary; issuance of proclamation by Secretary of State.

The chairman of a party’s State Executive Committee shall notify the Secretary of State if the party intends to hold a presidential preference primary. The Secretary of State shall be notified prior to December 1 of the year preceding the year in which a presidential preference primary may be held pursuant to Section 23-15-1081. Upon such notification, the Secretary of State shall issue a proclamation setting every party’s congressional and senatorial primary elections that are to be held in the year in which the presidential preference primary is to be held on the date provided for in Section 23-15-1083. Once the Secretary of State has issued a proclamation pursuant to this section, the date of the congressional and senatorial primary elections shall not be changed.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-13-7 [Laws, 1986, ch. 484, § 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 348]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 322, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-1087.
Applicability of law regulating primary and general elections.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the laws regulating primary and general elections shall in so far as practical apply to and govern presidential preference primary elections.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-13-9 [Laws, 1986, ch. 484, § 5; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 348]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 323, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§ 23-15-1089.
Candidates whose names shall be placed on ballot; announcement of names by Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall place the name of a candidate upon the presidential preference primary ballot when the Secretary of State shall have determined that such a candidate is qualified under Section 23-15-1093.

On or after January 15 immediately preceding a presidential preference primary election the Secretary of State shall publicly announce and distribute to the news media for publication a list of the candidates he intends to place on the ballot at the following presidential preference primary election. Following this announcement he shall not add candidates to his selection, and he shall not delete any candidate whose name appears on the announced list, unless the candidate dies or has withdrawn as a candidate as provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-13-11 [Laws, 1986, ch. 484, § 6; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 348]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 324; Laws, 2016, ch. 380, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 23-15-1091.
Notification of candidates by Secretary of State.

When the Secretary of State places the name of a candidate on the ballot pursuant to Section 23-15-1093, he shall notify the candidate that his name will appear on the ballot of this state in the presidential preference primary election.

The secretary shall also notify the candidate that he may withdraw his name from the ballot by filing with the Secretary of State an affidavit pursuant to Section 23-15-1095 no later than the sixtieth day before that election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-13-13 [Laws, 1986, ch. 484, § 7; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 348]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 325; Laws, 2016, ch. 380, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 23-15-1093.
Petition in support of candidacy; qualifying fee.

Any person desiring to have his name placed on the presidential preference primary ballot shall pay a qualifying fee and file the petition or petitions as described in this section.

The amount of the qualifying fee shall be Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00). Each independent candidate shall pay the qualifying fee to the Secretary of State. Each political party candidate shall pay the qualifying fee to the state executive committee of the appropriate political party.

A candidate shall file a petition or petitions in support of his candidacy with the state executive committee of the appropriate political party or the Secretary of State, whichever is applicable, after January 1 of the year in which the presidential preference primary is to be held and before January 15 of that same year. To comply with this section, a candidate may file a petition or petitions signed by a total of not less than five hundred (500) qualified electors of the state, or petitions signed by not less than one hundred (100) qualified electors of each congressional district of the state, in which case there shall be a separate petition for each congressional district. The petitions shall be in such form as prescribed by the state executive committee or Secretary of State, whichever is applicable; provided, that there shall be a space for the county of residence of each signer next to the space provided for his signature. No signature may be counted as valid unless the county of residence of the signer is provided. Each petition shall contain an affirmation under the penalties of perjury that each signer is a qualified elector in his congressional district or in the state, as appropriate.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-13-15 [Laws, 1986, ch. 484, § 8; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 348]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 326; Laws, 2016, ch. 380, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 23-15-1095.
Withdrawal of candidate.

A candidate’s name shall be printed on the appropriate primary ballot unless he or she submits to the Secretary of State before the printing of the official sample ballot, an affidavit stating without qualification that he or she is not now and does not presently intend to become a candidate for the Office of President of the United States at the upcoming nominating convention of his or her political party. If a candidate withdraws pursuant to this section, the Secretary of State shall notify the state executive committee of the political party of such candidate that the candidate’s name will not be placed on the ballot.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-13-17 [Laws, 1986, ch. 484, § 9; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 348]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 327; Laws, 1996, ch. 301, § 3, eff from and after January 25, 1996 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment of this section).

§ 23-15-1097.
Payment of expenses; compensation of election officials.

All expenses of the presidential preference primary election, which are authorized expenses, as provided by statute relating to primary or general elections, shall be paid in the same manner as provided by law. Compensation of election officials shall be limited to that which is authorized by statute.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-13-21 [Laws, 1986, ch. 484, § 11; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 348]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 328, eff from and after January 1, 1987.